North Carolina, session 2025, HB1235.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article III of the North Carolina Constitution reads as rewritten:
"Section 1. Executive power.
The executive power of the State shall be vested in the Governor. The General Assembly
shall have no power to enact any law that materially impairs the Governor's authority to
supervise, direct, and control the execution of the laws through administrative departments and
agencies of the State. This authority includes the necessary powers of majority appointment,
*H1235-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
removal, supervision, and administrative direction of entities intrinsic to the Governor's duty to
faithfully execute the laws of the State.
…
"Sec. 5. Duties of Governor.
…
(10) Administrative reorganization. The General Assembly shall prescribe the functions,
powers, and duties of the administrative departments and agencies of the State and may alter
them from time to time, but the time; provided that the General Assembly may not transfer
functions, powers, and duties between members of the Council of State unless (i) the transfer is
consistent with the nature of the office established by the Constitution to which the transfer is
made and (ii) the transfer is ratified into law no later than 90 days prior to the next election for
Council of State and will take effect no earlier than the commencement of the next term of office,
except as otherwise provided by a vote of approval by two-thirds of all the members of each
house. The Governor may make such changes in the allocation of offices and agencies and in the
allocation of those functions, powers, and duties as he considers necessary for efficient
administration. If those changes affect existing law, they shall be set forth in executive orders,
which shall be submitted to the General Assembly not later than the sixtieth calendar day of its
session, and shall become effective and shall have the force of law upon adjournment sine die of
the session, unless specifically disapproved by resolution of either house of the General
Assembly or specifically modified by joint resolution of both houses of the General Assembly.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) The amendments set out in this section shall be submitted to the
qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on November 3, 2026,
which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing elections at that time.
The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment limiting the authority of the General Assembly to
reorganize executive powers in a manner that would impair the Governor's authority to faithfully
execute the laws of the State, including imposing restrictions on the authority of the General
Assembly to reorganize powers, duties, and functions of Council of State members."
SECTION 1.(c) The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under subsection (b) of this section. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are in favor of the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the Secretary of
State shall enroll the amendment among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of
votes cast on the question are against the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the
amendment shall have no effect.
SECTION 1.(d) If the certification from the State Board of Elections under
subsection (c) of this section reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the amendment set out in subsection (a)
of this section is effective upon certification.
SECTION 2.(a) Article II of the North Carolina Constitution reads as rewritten:
"…
"Sec. 21. Style and content of the acts.
The style of the acts shall be: "The General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:". Each act
shall contain but one subject, which shall be clearly expressed in its title, except general
appropriation acts, revenue acts, and acts containing only technical corrections. If any subject is
embraced in an act but not expressed in the title, such act is void as to the unexpressed subject.
…
"Sec. 25. Legislative transparency and integrity.
(1) Original purpose. No bill shall be altered or amended after first reading so as to
materially change its original purpose as reflected in its title. If any subject other than the
Page 2 House Bill 1235-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
resolution of areas of dispute between the houses is adopted in a conference report, the act is void
as to that adopted subject.
(2) Public notice. Unless the bill is in response to a declared state of emergency and the
reading of the bill is approved by vote of two-thirds of all the members of the house, no bill shall
be read for the final time required for passage in the house until (i) the house has published at
least 24 hours earlier a calendar for the session noticing the session during which the bill is to be
read and (ii) the bill text to be read has been made available to the members of the house and to
the public for at least 48 consecutive hours."
SECTION 2.(b) The amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section shall be
submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on
November 3, 2026, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing
elections at that time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment limiting the number of subjects that can be in a bill to one,
except for appropriations bills, tax bills, and technical corrections bills, and requiring a minimum
amount of notice and publication of the text of bills to legislative members and the public prior
to final passage."
SECTION 2.(c) The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under subsection (b) of this section. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are in favor of the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the Secretary of
State shall enroll the amendment among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of
votes cast on the question are against the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the
amendment shall have no effect.
SECTION 2.(d) If the certification from the State Board of Elections under
subsection (c) of this section reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in subsection (a) of this section, the amendment set out in subsection (a)
of this section is effective upon certification.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 1235-First Edition Page 3